Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-905.01
Rule or regulation; review by Attorney General.

A copy of each amendment or rule or regulation to be adopted under the Administrative Procedure Act, prior to the date of filing with the Secretary of State, shall be submitted to the Attorney General for his or her consideration as to the statutory authority and constitutionality of such amendment or rule or regulation and his or her approval or disapproval thereof, including a determination as to whether or not the rule or regulation submitted is substantially different from the published proposed rule or regulation. If the amendment or rule or regulation to be filed is approved as to legality by the Attorney General, he or she shall so indicate with his or her stamp of approval which shall be dated and signed.

Laws 1947, c. 350, § 5, p. 1099;

Laws 1969, c. 837, § 3, p. 3161;

Laws 1974, LB 604, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 992, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 253, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 446, § 17.